Maine, session 132, LD213.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 8 MRSA §374, sub-§1, ¶K, as amended by PL 2011, c. 310, §7, is further
amended to read:
K. The manner and amount of compensation to be paid to persons licensed to sell
lottery tickets or shares necessary to provide for the adequate availability of tickets or
shares to prospective buyers and for the convenience of the general public. Rules
adopted by the commission must provide that a person licensed to sell lottery tickets
or shares is entitled to a minimum 10% sales commission for each instant lottery game
ticket sold and each draw or other terminal-generated game ticket sold;